Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 4. Restructured Financial and Administrative Authority; Covered Institutions; Management Agreements.
§ 23.1-1016.
Covered institutions; operational authority; financial operations; capital projects.

The governing board of each covered institution shall adopt policies for the review, approval, and implementation of all capital projects undertaken by the institution.

All capital projects of a covered institution, whether funded by an appropriation of the General Assembly or otherwise, shall be approved by the institution’s governing board.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision D 2, capital projects undertaken at a covered institution may be exempt from any capital outlay oversight performed or required by the Department of General Services, the Division of Engineering and Buildings, the Department of Planning and Budget, and any other state agency that supports the functions performed by such departments.

Capital projects undertaken at a covered institution are subject to the institution’s capital project policies adopted pursuant to subsection A and:

Any capital project undertaken at a covered institution that costs $300,000 or more is subject to the environmental, historic preservation, and conservation requirements of state law that are generally applicable to capital projects in the Commonwealth;

If the capital project is funded in whole or in part with a general fund appropriation for that purpose or proceeds from bonds issued under Article X, Section 9 (a), 9 (b), or 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia, or under Article X, Section 9 (d) of the Constitution of Virginia, if such issuance is supported by general funds, the project shall remain subject to the pre-appropriation approvals that are in effect within the executive and legislative branches of state government but may be exempt under the management agreement from any state post-appropriation review, approval, administrative, or other policy or procedure functions performed or required by the Department of General Services, the Division of Engineering and Buildings, the Department of Planning and Budget, and any other state agency that supports the functions performed by such departments; and

If a covered institution constructs improvements on land or renovates property that was originally acquired or constructed in whole or in part with a general fund appropriation for that purpose or proceeds from bonds issued under Article X, Section 9 (a), 9 (b), or 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia, or under Article X, Section 9 (d) of the Constitution of Virginia, if such issuance is supported by general funds, and such improvements or renovations are undertaken entirely with funds not appropriated by the General Assembly, such improvements or renovations shall be consistent with such institution’s master plan approved by its governing board and, if the cost of such improvements or renovations is reasonably expected to exceed $2 million, the institution’s decision to undertake such improvements or renovations shall be communicated to the Governor and to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations and the House Committee on Appropriations no later than 60 days prior to the (i) commencement of construction or renovation or (ii) issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations to finance such construction or renovation.

Each covered institution may designate a full-time employee to be its own building official and may determine the suitability for occupancy of and issue certifications for building occupancy for all capital projects undertaken at such institution. Such building official shall:

Ensure that the Virginia Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.) requirements are met for that capital project and that such project has been inspected by the State Fire Marshal or his designee prior to issuing any such certification;

Report directly and exclusively to the governing board of the institution and be subject to review by the appropriate personnel in the Department of General Services;

Be certified by the Department of Housing and Community Development to perform this function; and

Have adequate resources and staff who are certified by the Department of Housing and Community Development in accordance with §

36-137

for such purpose and who shall review plans, specifications, and documents for compliance with codes and standards and perform required inspections of the work in progress and the completed project.

No individual licensed professional architect or engineer hired or contracted to perform the functions set forth in subsection E shall also perform other code-related design, construction, facilities-related project management, or facilities management functions for the institution on the same project.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.109; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 23.1-1017.
Covered institutions; operational authority; procurement.

Subject to the express provisions of the management agreement, each covered institution may be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), except for §§

2.2-4340

,

2.2-4340

.1,

2.2-4340.2

,

2.2-4342

, and

2.2-4376.2

, which shall not be construed to require compliance with the prequalification application procedures of subsection B of §

2.2-4317

, provided, however, that (i) any deviations from the Virginia Public Procurement Act in the management agreement shall be uniform across all covered institutions and (ii) the governing board of the covered institution shall adopt, and the covered institution shall comply with, policies for the procurement of goods and services, including professional services, that shall (a) be based upon competitive principles; (b) in each instance seek competition to the maximum practical degree; (c) implement a system of competitive negotiation for professional services pursuant to §§

2.2-4303.1

and

2.2-4302.2

; (d) prohibit discrimination in the solicitation and award of contracts on the basis of the bidder’s or offeror’s race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or disability or on any other basis prohibited by state or federal law; (e) incorporate the prompt payment principles of §§

2.2-4350

and

2.2-4354

; (f) consider the impact on correctional enterprises under §

53.1-47

; and (g) provide that whenever solicitations are made seeking competitive procurement of goods or services, it shall be a priority of the institution to provide for fair and reasonable consideration of small, women-owned, and minority-owned businesses and to promote and encourage a diversity of suppliers.

Such policies may (i) provide for consideration of the dollar amount of the intended procurement, the term of the anticipated contract, and the likely extent of competition; (ii) implement a prequalification procedure for contractors or products; and (iii) include provisions for cooperative arrangements with other covered institutions, other public or private educational institutions, or other public or private organizations or entities, including public-private partnerships, public bodies, charitable organizations, health care provider alliances or purchasing organizations or entities, state agencies or institutions of the Commonwealth or the other states, the District of Columbia, the territories, or the United States, and any combination of such organizations and entities.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a covered institution from requesting and utilizing the assistance of the Virginia Information Technologies Agency for information technology procurements and covered institutions are encouraged to utilize such assistance.

Each covered institution shall post on the Department of General Services’ central electronic procurement website all Invitations to Bid, Requests for Proposal, sole source award notices, and emergency award notices to ensure visibility and access to the Commonwealth’s procurement opportunities on one website.

As part of any procurement provisions of the management agreement, the governing board of a covered institution shall identify the public, educational, and operational interests served by any procurement rule that deviates from procurement rules in the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.110; 2011, c. 332; 2013, c. 583; 2015, cc. 760, 776; 2016, c. 588; 2020, cc. 496, 497, 1137; 2022, cc. 96, 97.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 96 and
97, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of
§

2.2-4376.2

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on June 30, 2027.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 496 and 497 are identical, and substituted “§§

2.2-4340

,

2.2-4340.1

,

2.2-4340.2

, and

2.2-4342

” for “§

2.2-4342

” in subsection A in the introductory language.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, in clause (ii)(d) of subsection A, inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 96 and 97 are identical, and inserted “2.2-4376.2” in subsection A; and made stylistic changes.

§ 23.1-1018.
Covered institutions; operational authority; information technology.

Subject to the terms of the management agreement, each covered institution may be exempt from the provisions governing the Virginia Information Technologies Agency, Chapter 20.1 (§

2.2-2005

et seq.) of Title 2.2, and the provisions governing the Information Technology Advisory Council, Article 35 (§

2.2-2699.5

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 2.2, if the governing board of such covered institution adopts and the covered institution complies with (i) policies for the procurement of information technology goods and services, including professional services, that are consistent with the requirements of §

23.1-1017

and include provisions addressing cooperative arrangements for such procurement as described in §

23.1-1017

and (ii) institutional policies and professional best practices regarding strategic planning for information technology, project management, security, budgeting, infrastructure, and ongoing operations.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.111; 2010, cc. 136, 145; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1019.
Covered institutions; operational authority; property, grants, and loans.

Nothing in this section shall limit or reduce the authority granted to a covered institution in §§

23.1-1016

and

23.1-1028

concerning the planning, design, construction, and implementation of capital projects and leases.

Each covered institution may continue to hold, possess, operate, and dispose of any real, personal, tangible, or intangible property that such covered institution held, possessed, or operated prior to the effective date of its initial management agreement as follows:

For real property, including land, buildings, and any improvements to land or buildings, acquired or constructed in whole or in part with general fund appropriations or proceeds from a general obligation bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (a) or 9 (b) of the Constitution of Virginia, the covered institution shall (i) hold, possess, and operate such property in accordance with the institution’s enabling statutes, this article, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article and (ii) dispose of such property in accordance with general law applicable to state-owned property and the institution’s enabling statutes.

For real property, including land, buildings, and any improvements to land or buildings, acquired or constructed either (i) entirely with nongeneral fund appropriations or proceeds from a nongeneral fund revenue bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (c) or 9 (d) of the Constitution of Virginia or (ii) entirely with funds other than funds appropriated by the General Assembly or proceeds from a general obligation bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (a) or 9 (b) of the Constitution of Virginia, the covered institution shall hold, possess, operate, and dispose of such property in accordance with the institution’s enabling statutes, notwithstanding the provisions of this article, the approval requirements of subdivision B 1 of §

23.1-1301

, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article.

For personal property, the covered institution shall hold, possess, operate, and dispose of such property in accordance with the institution’s enabling statutes, this article, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article.

After the effective date of the initial management agreement, a covered institution may acquire any real property, construct improvements on real property pursuant to §

23.1-1016

, and acquire any personal property, tangible or intangible, and hold, possess, operate, and dispose of such real and personal property as follows:

For real property, including land, buildings, and improvements to land and buildings, acquired or constructed with funds appropriated by the General Assembly for that purpose or with proceeds from a general obligation bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (a) or 9 (b) of the Constitution of Virginia, the covered institution shall (i) hold, possess, and operate such property in accordance with the institution’s enabling statutes, this article, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article, and (ii) dispose of such property in accordance with general law applicable to state-owned property and with the covered institution’s enabling statutes.

For real property, including land, buildings, and improvements to land or buildings, acquired with any funds in the covered institution’s possession other than funds appropriated by the General Assembly or proceeds from a general obligation bond issue under Article X, Section 9 (a) or 9 (b) of the Constitution of Virginia, the institution shall hold, possess, operate, dispose of, and otherwise deal with such property, or any right, easement, estate, or interest in such property, acquired by purchase, exchange, gift, assignment, transfer, foreclosure, lease, bequest, devise, operation of law, or other means, in accordance with the covered institution’s enabling statutes, notwithstanding the provisions of this article, the approval requirements of subdivision B 1 of §

23.1-1301

, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article.

For personal property, the institution shall hold, possess, operate, and dispose of such property in accordance with the institution’s enabling statutes, this article, and any policies adopted by the governing board of the institution pursuant to this article.

With the approval of the Governor or as otherwise provided by law, and consistent with subsections B and C, a covered institution may (i) sell, assign, encumber, mortgage, demolish, or otherwise dispose of any project, any other real, personal, tangible, or intangible property, any right, easement, estate, or interest in any such project or property, or any deed of trust or mortgage lien interest owned by it, under its control or custody or in its possession, and may release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement, or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it, and (ii) do any of the foregoing by public or private transaction.

A covered institution may accept loans, grants, contributions, or other assistance from the federal government, the Commonwealth, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any other public or private source to carry out its mission as a public institution of higher education and any of the purposes of this article. A covered institution may enter into any agreement or contract regarding the acceptance, use, or repayment of any such loan, grant, contribution, or assistance and may enter into other agreements with any such entity in furtherance of the purposes of this article.

Localities may lend or donate money or other property to a covered institution for any of the institution’s purposes. Any local government making a grant or loan may restrict the use of the grant or loan to a specific project, within or outside such locality.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no covered institution shall take action with regard to any real or personal property if such action would be deemed to be in violation of any requirement or covenant contained in any outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.112; 2016, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to disposition of surplus materials, see §

2.2-1124

.

As to conveyance and transfers of real property by state agencies, see §

2.2-1150

.

§ 23.1-1020.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; covered employees generally.

Each covered employee shall continue to be a state employee who is governed by and eligible to participate in the human resources and benefits programs that governed him and in which he was eligible to participate immediately prior to the effective date of the initial management agreement for the covered institution by which he is employed, including the state retirement system, state health insurance program, state workers’ compensation coverage program, and state grievance procedure, until the covered institution establishes a human resources program or programs, plan, or procedure applicable to him pursuant to this article in any such human resources or benefits program area. If, however, a covered institution is permitted by law other than in this chapter to establish an alternative health insurance plan or an alternative faculty or University of Virginia Medical Center retirement plan, such alternative health insurance or faculty or University of Virginia Medical Center retirement plan shall apply to and govern the covered employees included in such plan.

All human resources programs, plans, policies, and procedures established by the governing board of a covered institution pursuant to this article shall apply to and govern all participating covered employees, except as provided in §

23.1-1022

.

All covered institutions are responsible for meeting the human resource reporting requirements established by the Governor and General Assembly.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.114; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1021.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; establishment of a human resources program.

As used in this section, “active military duty” means federally funded military duty as (i) a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty pursuant to Title 10 of the United States Code or (ii) a member of the Virginia National Guard on active duty pursuant to either Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code.

The governing board of each covered institution may elect to adopt for its nonfaculty participating covered employees either (i) one or more human resources programs that is or are generally consistent with the provisions of Chapters 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) and 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2, pertaining generally to state employees, or (ii) such other human resources program or programs as it determines to be appropriate. The covered institution may administer such human resources program or programs itself or contract with another covered institution or the Department of Human Resources Management to administer some or all of its human resources programs, subject to the execution of any participation or operating agreement as the parties to that agreement may deem necessary and appropriate.

Each covered institution may (i) establish a human resources program or programs for participating covered employees who are not subject to a human resources program established pursuant to subsection B, including a program or programs relating to such employees that its enabling statutes authorizes it to employ and (ii) contract for such consultants, attorneys, accountants, financial experts, and independent providers of expert advice and consultation as such institution deems necessary or desirable to assist in the establishment of such program.

Any human resources program adopted by the governing board of a covered institution for participating covered employees shall be based on merit principles and objective methods of appointment, promotion, transfer, layoff, removal, severance, and discipline and shall include other appropriate topics based on such principles and methods.

The human resources program adopted by the governing board of a covered institution shall, consistent with applicable federal law, address (i) the employment of participating covered employees who leave the service of a covered institution for service in any of the Armed Forces of the United States, (ii) the employment of veterans who have served in any of the Armed Forces of the United States following the termination of their military service, and (iii) leave and other policies affecting the employment of participating covered employees who have been ordered to active military duty in the Armed Forces of the United States or the organized reserve forces of any of the Armed Forces of the United States or the Virginia National Guard.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.116; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1022.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; election by certain covered employees.

If the governing board of a covered institution establishes a human resources program or programs pursuant to §

23.1-1021

, a salaried nonfaculty covered employee who was employed by the covered institution on the day prior to the effective date of the initial management agreement, except employees of the University of Virginia Medical Center, may elect within a prescribed period of the establishment of the human resources program to participate in and be governed by either (i) the state human resources program set forth in Chapters 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) and 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2 or (ii) the human resources program or programs established by the governing board of the covered institution pursuant to §

23.1-1021

. If the salaried nonfaculty covered employee does not make an election within such prescribed period, he shall be deemed to have elected to participate in and be governed by the state human resources program. Elections to participate in the human resources program established by the covered institution are irrevocable. At least once every two years, each covered institution that establishes a human resources program pursuant to §

23.1-1021

shall provide salaried nonfaculty employees who elected to participate and be governed by the state human resources program with (a) a comparison of the state program and the institution’s program, including an assessment of compensation and benefits, and (b) an opportunity to participate in and be governed by the institution’s human resources program.

A salaried nonfaculty covered employee who elects to participate in and be governed by the state human resources program set forth in Chapters 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) and 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall continue to be governed by all state human resources and benefit plans, programs, policies, and procedures that apply to and govern state employees.

A salaried nonfaculty covered employee who elects to participate in and be governed by the human resources program or programs established by the governing board of the covered institution pursuant to §

23.1-1021

shall be deemed to have elected to be eligible to participate in and be governed by the human resources plans, programs, policies, and procedures adopted by the covered institution for his employment classification pursuant to §§

23.1-1024

,

23.1-1025

, and

23.1-1026

.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.115; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1023.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; grievance procedures.

No covered institution is exempt from the State Grievance Procedure (§

2.2-3000

et seq.), which shall continue to apply to all eligible nonfaculty covered employees of a covered institution. The governing board of each covered institution shall adopt policies that encourage the resolution of employment-related problems and complaints of its nonfaculty covered employees. Such policies shall provide that nonfaculty covered employees of the institution may discuss their concerns with their immediate supervisors and management freely and without retaliation. To the extent that such concerns cannot be resolved informally, the State Grievance Procedure (§

2.2-3000

et seq.) shall apply (i) to the covered institution’s nonfaculty participating covered employees to the same extent that it applied to the same classifications of nonfaculty employees prior to the institution’s effective date of the initial management agreement and (ii) to the covered institution’s salaried nonfaculty covered employees who have elected pursuant to §

23.1-1022

to continue to participate in the state human resources program set forth in Chapters 28 (§

2.2-2800

et seq.) and 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

The grievance policies that were applicable to faculty covered employees prior to the effective date of the initial management agreement shall continue in effect but may be amended by the covered institution.

A covered institution may adopt grievance policies that are applicable to some or all other employees not subject to grievance policies pursuant to subsection A or B. Such grievance policies may be the same as the grievance policies adopted pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.117; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1024.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; miscellaneous personnel matters.

Each covered institution shall base all appointments, promotions, and tenure decisions upon merit and fitness, to be ascertained, as far as possible, by the competitive rating of qualifications by that institution.

No establishment of a position or rate of pay or change in rate of pay shall become effective except on order of the appointing covered institution.

No current or prospective participating covered employee of any covered institution shall be required, as a condition of employment, to smoke or use tobacco products on the job or abstain from smoking or using tobacco products outside the course of his employment, provided that this subsection shall not apply to those classes of employees to which §

27-40.1

or

51.1-813

is applicable.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.118; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1025.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; certain insurance plans.

Insurance plans provided under this article and all proceeds from such plans are subject to the same provisions regarding exemption from levy, garnishment, and other legal process as is provided to Virginia Retirement System plans under §

51.1-510

, provided, however, that (i) permitted assignments shall be made through completion of forms provided by the covered institution or its vendor and (ii) for insurance plans established by a covered institution, the covered institution shall exercise the authority granted to the Board of the Virginia Retirement System in §

51.1-510

.

Each covered institution (i) shall purchase or make available group life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance plans covering in whole or in part those of its participating covered employees eligible to participate in the Virginia Retirement System and (ii) may purchase or make available such additional insurance plans covering its participating covered employees as it deems appropriate. Participating covered employees shall not be required to present evidence of insurability satisfactory to an insurance company for basic group life insurance coverage. Each covered institution shall offer all salaried participating covered employees basic group life insurance at a level of coverage determined by the institution’s governing board. A covered institution may require participating covered employees to pay all or a portion of the cost of the insurance coverage offered pursuant to this subsection, which may be collected through a payroll deduction program. If the institution’s governing board so elects, and subject to the execution of such participation agreements as the Virginia Retirement System may require, the covered institution’s participating covered employees may be covered by the Virginia Retirement System’s group insurance programs established pursuant to Chapter 5 (§

51.1-500

et seq.) of Title 51.1 with the same terms, costs, conditions, and benefits as other state employees.

For those of its participating covered employees eligible to participate in the Virginia Retirement System, a covered institution shall (i) purchase disability insurance; (ii) subject to the execution of such participation agreements as may be necessary, appropriate, and in the best interests of the Commonwealth, continue to participate in the disability insurance program established for state agencies; (iii) establish a self-insured disability insurance program; or (iv) perform any combination of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii). A covered institution may require participating covered employees to pay all or a portion of the cost of the insurance coverage offered pursuant to clause (i), (iii), or (iv), which may be collected through a payroll deduction program. However, no such covered institution shall be required to contribute to the program established for state agencies on behalf of participating covered employees who do not participate in that program.

If a covered institution’s governing board so elects, and subject to the execution of such participation agreements as may be necessary, appropriate, and in the best interests of the Commonwealth, each such institution or its participating covered employees, or both, may participate in any future insurance programs established for state employees with the same terms, conditions, and benefits as other state employees.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.119; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1026.
Covered institutions; operational authority; human resources; severance policies.

Each covered institution shall adopt a severance policy for its eligible participating covered employees that is applicable to voluntary and involuntary separations, including reductions in workforce. The provisions of the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.) shall not apply to participating covered employees.

The terms and conditions of a covered institution’s severance policy for eligible participating covered employees shall be determined by the institution’s governing board. The covered institution and the Board of the Virginia Retirement System shall negotiate a formula according to which cash severance benefits may be converted to years of age or creditable service for participating covered employees who participate in the Virginia Retirement System.

Covered employees who (i) were employees of a covered institution and were covered by the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2 prior to the effective date of the initial management agreement, (ii) would otherwise be eligible for severance benefits under the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.), and (iii) are separated by a covered institution because of a reduction in workforce have the same preferential hiring rights with state agencies and other executive branch institutions as other state employees have under §

2.2-3201

. A covered institution shall recognize the hiring preference conferred by §

2.2-3201

on state employees who were (a) hired by a state agency or executive branch institution before the covered institution’s effective date of the initial management agreement and (b) separated after that date by that state agency or executive branch institution because of a reduction in workforce. If a covered institution has adopted a classification system pursuant to §

23.1-1021

that differs from the classification system administered by the Department of Human Resource Management, the covered institution shall classify the separated employee according to its classification system and shall place the separated employee appropriately. Any such separated employee who is hired by a covered institution is a participating covered employee for purposes of this article. Classification decisions that are made pursuant to this subsection and apply to employees transferring between state agencies, between other executive branch institutions and covered institutions, and between covered institutions as a result of a reduction in workforce and with the preferential hiring rights provided in this subsection and in §

2.2-3201

are presumed appropriate, and a separated employee who grieves the classification decision bears the burden of demonstrating that the classification violates the separated employee’s preferential hiring rights.

An employee’s transition from being an employee of a public institution of higher education to being a covered employee of a covered institution on the effective date of a covered institution’s initial management agreement shall not, in and of itself, constitute a severance of that employee or a reduction in workforce that would make either the covered institution’s severance policy adopted pursuant to subsection A or the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.) applicable to that employee.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.120; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, substituted “reduction in workforce” for “reduction in force” in the last sentence of subsection C and in subsection D.

§ 23.1-1027.
Covered institutions; duties; tuition, fees, rentals, and other charges.

Each covered institution shall fix, revise, charge, and collect tuition, rates, rentals, fees, and other charges for the services, goods, or facilities furnished by or on behalf of such institution and may adopt policies regarding any such service rendered or the use, occupancy, or operation of any such facility.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.103; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1028.
Covered institutions; duties; leases of property.

The governing board of each covered institution shall adopt such policies relating to the leasing of real property, including capital or operating/income leases, that reasonably ensure that such leases are efficiently procured on appropriate terms and for appropriate purposes. With respect to capital or operating/income leases for real property to be used for academic purposes or for real property owned by the institution or a foundation relating to the institution to be used for non-academic purposes in accordance with the institution’s land use plan pursuant to §

2.2-1153

, other than applicable policies adopted by a covered institution’s governing board and provisions of general law that expressly apply to covered institutions, such institutions are exempt from any state or local statutes, ordinances, rules, regulations, and guidelines relating to (i) operating/income leases of real property by public entities and (ii) except as otherwise provided in §§

23.1-1016

and

23.1-1019

, capital leases.

History.

2005, cc. 933, 945, § 23-38.113; 2016, c. 588.